Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2600.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 37 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DROADWAY SAFETY AND TOWING RECOVERY REIMBURSEMENTSec.3761. Definitions.3762. Reimbursement of towing and recovery services.3763. Funding.3764. Cost recovery.3765. Administration.3766. Report to General Assembly.3767. Regulations.3768. Implementation guidance.1234567891011121314151617181920 3769. Construction.§ 3761. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"FHWA incident response framework." A reimbursement or cost-recovery process consistent with Federal Highway Administration guidance relating to best practices of traffic incident management, emergency response, rapid clearance and restoration of roadway safety."Reasonable and necessary." In relation to towing and recovery services directly required to restore roadway safety, reduce secondary crashes, protect first responders or restore traffic flow, as documented by a responding law enforcement agency or roadway authority."Roadway authority." The department, a county, municipality or other governmental entity with jurisdiction over a roadway or traffic incident response."Safety entity." A public safety agency or roadway authority involved in traffic incident response. The term includes a provider of towing and recovery services acting at the direction of a law enforcement agency or roadway authority."Towing and recovery services." The removal, uprighting, stabilization or extraction of vehicles, cargo or debris from a roadway or highway right-of-way when necessary to restore roadway safety or traffic flow.§ 3762. Reimbursement of towing and recovery services.(a) Authorization.--A roadway authority may reimburse a safety entity for towing and recovery services in accordance with this section.20260HB2600PN3521 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Limitation.--Reimbursement under this section is limited to expenses incurred for towing and removal services that are reasonable and necessary.(c) Alignment.--Reimbursement under this subchapter shall align with the FHWA incident response framework.(d) Responsibility of vehicle owners and insurers.--Primary responsibility for payment of towing and recovery services of a vehicle shall remain with the vehicle owner or insurer of the vehicle. Reimbursement of a safety entity under this subchapter may not occur unless payment from the vehicle owner or insurer is not reasonably obtainable.(e) Required documentation.--A roadway authority may not provide reimbursement to a safety entity under this subchapter unless the following is provided in a claim form approved by the roadway authority:(1) An incident report.(2) An authorization of the towing or removal service.(3) An itemized invoice.(4) Proof the towing or removal services were reasonable and necessary.(f) Review period.--A roadway authority shall review a claim for reimbursement not later than 45 days after receipt of all documentation required under subsection (e).(g) Per-incident reimbursement limits.--The department may establish per-incident reimbursement limits and procedures, subject to available appropriations, for extraordinary incidents requiring specialized equipment, complex recovery operations or extended roadway closures.§ 3763. Funding.The department shall pay claims for reimbursement under this 20260HB2600PN3521 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subchapter from money appropriated or otherwise made available to the department for that purpose and may allocate the money to other roadway authorities for that purpose.§ 3764. Cost recovery.A roadway authority may pursue cost recovery from at-fault parties or insurers for the payment of reasonable and necessary towing and removal services.§ 3765. Administration.The department shall administer this subchapter and establish procedures for eligibility, documentation, coordination with law enforcement and compliance with Federal law.§ 3766. Report to General Assembly.The department shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly that includes:(1) The total number of claims for which reimbursement under this subchapter was requested by safety entities.(2) The number of claims approved and denied by the department.(3) The total dollar amount of claims approved by the department.(4) The department's rationale for denial of any claims.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the department relating to reimbursements required under this subchapter.§ 3767. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer this subchapter.§ 3768. Implementation guidance.The department shall issue guidance on the implementation of the department's duties under this subchapter no later than four 20260HB2600PN3521 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 months after the effective date of this section.§ 3769. Construction.Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:(1) establish a private right of action;(2) expand civil liability;(3) impose an insurance coverage requirement;(4) regulate towing rates;(5) affect contracts entered into prior to the effective date of this section; or(6) supersede towing laws of safety entities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20260HB2600PN3521 - 5 - 1234567891011